Vermont, session 2025-2026, H110.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 277 is amended to read:
§ 277. MALT, VINOUS, AND READY-TO-DRINK SPIRITS BEVERAGE
CONSUMER SHIPPING LICENSE
* * *
(b)(1) A manufacturer or rectifier of malt beverages, vinous beverages, or
ready-to-drink spirits beverages licensed in another state that operates a
brewery, winery, or distillery in the United States and holds valid state and
VT LEG #379954 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.110
2025 Page 2 of 2
federal permits and licenses may be granted an out-of-state consumer shipping
license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an application in a form
required by the Commissioner accompanied by copies of the applicant’s
current out-of-state manufacturer’s license and the fee provided in section 204
of this title.
(2) A manufacturer or rectifier of malt beverages may be granted an out-
of-state consumer shipping license only if the manufacturer or rectifier holds a
license and operates a brewery in a state that allows Vermont manufacturers or
rectifiers to ship malt beverages to consumers in that state.
(3) An out-of-state consumer shipping license may be renewed annually
by submitting to the Division the fee provided in section 204 of this title
accompanied by the licensee’s current out-of-state manufacturer’s license.
(3)(4) As used in this section, “out-of-state” means any state other than
Vermont, any territory or possession of the United States, and does not include
a foreign country.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379954 v.1